Washington statutes.
RCW 35.76.020

Cost accounting and reporting—Cities over eight thousand.

The state auditor shall formulate, prescribe, and install a system of cost accounting and reporting for each city having a population of more than eight thousand, according to the last official census, which will correctly show all street expenditures by functional categories. The system shall also provide for reporting all revenues available for street purposes from whatever source including local improvement district assessments and state and federal aid.

[ 1995 c 301 s 48; 1965 c 7 s 35.76.020. Prior: 1963 c 115 s 2.]

NOTES:

Cities over eight thousand, equipment rental fund in street department: RCW 35.21.088.